Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-508
Nebraska National Guard; tuition; credits; educational institution; reimbursement.

Upon receipt of a certificate described in section 85-506, the educational institution shall endorse on the certificate the dollar amount of the tuition credit granted pursuant to such section and return such certificate to the Nebraska National Guard office issuing the certificate. The educational institution shall compile a record of the total dollar amount of the tuition credits granted for the academic term. At the completion of the academic term, the institution shall submit the total amount of such credits together with a request for reimbursement of such amount to the National Guard. Upon receipt of the request, the National Guard shall reimburse the institution.

Laws 1980, LB 526, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 931, § 5.